hfst-tools/hfst-lexc/test/divvun-sme/sme-lex.txt
LEXICON OVDDIT ! Inherently comparative adjectives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%>b K ;
 +A+Comp:%>b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:%>muss BUOREMUS ;

LEXICON MADDELEABBO ! Inherently comparative adjectives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%> K ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;










! Nominal derivation
! ------------------

! Noun derivation
! - - - - - - - -


LEXICON VUOHTA !+SgGenCmp +DefPlGenCmp
 +Der3+Der/vuohta+N:»#vuoh'ta@C.NeedNoun@ VUOHTAMORPH ;

LEXICON VUOHTAMORPH
! NomV ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
 +SgNomCmp:%> R ; !SUB
 +Der/viđá+Adv:»viđá K ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
 :%> GOAHTE- ;
 +SgGenCmp:%>X4 R ;



!LEXICON AGNoun  !These are found in LEXICON NAMAT
! juolgi:juol'gi AGAdj "foot N" ;
! čalbmi AGAdj "eye N" ;
! njunni AGAdj ;
! gieh0ta:gieh'ta AGAdj ;
! čielgi:čiel'gi AGAdj "back N" ;
! giella:giella AGAdj ;
! jah0ki:jah'ki AGAdj ;
! ah0ki:ah'ki AGAdj ;
! luon0du:luon'du AGAdj ;
! áv0ju:áv'ju AGAdj ;
! čoar0vi:čoar'vi AGAdj ;
! vuok0ta:vuok'ta AGAdj ;
! suorri AGAdj ;
! miella AGAdj ;
! suorbma AGAdj "finger N" ;
! čuv0di:čuv'di AGAdj ;
! suor0ge:suor'ge AGAdj ;
! čiehka AGAdj ;


LEXICON DenominalNounsV
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ž DIMINC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»X6žažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»X6žažža%> JOHTOLAHKA- ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ž DIMINC ;
! This is what I want, do this at some point!
! +Der/laš+N:»lažž MUSH ;
! this one was removed bec. of +Der/laš+A in the DenominalAdjsV
! lexicon. But was there any good reason for the laš -> MUSH
! pointer in the first place?

LEXICON DenominalNounsC
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»ažž DIMINV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»ačča»ž MALIS0 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:»ačča»ž MALLAS- ;



LEXICON EAPMI
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+SgCmp:%>an R ;
 +N+SgCmp+Der/viđá+Adv:»anviđá K ;
! +N+SgCmp+Der/viđi+Adv:»anviđi K ;
 +N+SgCmp:%>an VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:eame%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eame%> K ;
 +N:eapmi%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:eapmi%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:eapmi%>X4 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>an K ; !PP-frases
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X4t K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X5jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:eapmi%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:eapmi%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X8 K ; ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON MUITTASJEAPMI
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+SgCmp:%>an R ;	!no compounds for these, but reintroduced
 +N+SgCmp+Der/viđá+Adv:»anviđá K ;
! +N+SgCmp+Der/viđi+Adv:»anviđi K ;
 +N+SgCmp:%>an VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:eame%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eame%> K ;
 +N:eapmi%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:eapmi%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:eapmi%>X4 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>an K ; !PP-frases
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X4t K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X5jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:eapmi%>X5jd R ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:eapmi%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X8 K ; ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON EAPMITV  !+SgCmp +DefSgGenCmp +DefPlGenCmp +SgLeft +SgNomLeft +SgGenLeft +PlGenLeft
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+SgCmp:%>an R ;
 +N+SgCmp+Der/viđá+Adv:»anviđá K ;
! +N+SgCmp+Der/viđi+Adv:»anviđi K ;
 +N+SgCmp:%>an VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:eame%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eame%> K ;
 +N:eapmi%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:eapmi%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:eapmi%>X4 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>an K ; !PP-frases
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X4t K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X5jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:eapmi%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:eapmi%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X8 K ; ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON MUITTASJEAPMITV  !+SgCmp +DefSgGenCmp +DefPlGenCmp +SgLeft +SgNomLeft +SgGenLeft +PlGenLeft
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:eapmi Px3V ;
 +N+SgCmp:%>an R ;
 +N+SgCmp+Der/viđá+Adv:»anviđá K ;
! +N+SgCmp+Der/viđi+Adv:»anviđi K ;
 +N+SgCmp:%>an VEARA ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eapmi%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:eame%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:eame%> K ;
 +N:eapmi%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:eapmi%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:eapmi%>X4 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>an K ; !PP-frases
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:eapmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:eapmi%>X4st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X4t K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:eapmi%>X5jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:eapmi%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:eapmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:eapmi%>X5jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc:eapmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:eapmi%>X5jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:eapmi%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen:eapmi%>X8 K ; ! Ditto (?)


LEXICON UPMI  !+Last
 +N+Sg+Nom:upmi%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:upmi Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:upmi%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:upmi%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N:upmi%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:upmi%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:upmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:upmi%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:upmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:upmi%>X4 Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:upmi%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:upmi%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:upmi%>X4st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:upmi%>X4t K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:upmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:upmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:upmi%>X5jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:upmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:upmi%>X5jd R ;	!SUB
 +N+Pl+Gen:upmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:upmi%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:upmi%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:upmi%>X5jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:upmi%>X5jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:upmi%>X5jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:upmi%>X5js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc:upmi%>X5jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:upmi%>X5jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:upmi%>X5jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:upmi%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen:upmi%>X8 K ;

LEXICON VUONAT !+SgNomCmp +SgGenCmp +PlGenCmp
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom:»t K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgNomCmp:»t R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Ess:»gin K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom:»g PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»ga K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgGenCmp:»ga R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»t K ; !SUB
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»g PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»ga K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»t K ; !SUB
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»g PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»gat K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»gasa PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»gijddá Px1V ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»gij K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»gis K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»gin K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»gijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»gijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+PlGenCmp:»gijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»gijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»gijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»gijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»gijs K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»gijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»gistti PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»gijnni PxV ; !^P^
! +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»gijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»gijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»gijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»gijddás PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»gijnni PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»gijddi PxPlComV1 ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Ess:»hin K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Nom:»h PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»ha K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+SgGenCmp:»ha R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Gen:»h PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»ha K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Acc:»h PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»hat K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»hasa PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»hijddá Px1V ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Ill:»hij K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»his K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»hin K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»hijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»hijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+PlGenCmp:»hijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»hijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»hijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»hijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»hijs K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»hijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Loc:»histti PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Sg+Com:»hijnni PxV ; !^P^
! +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Nom:»hijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Gen:»hijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Acc:»hijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Ill:»hijddás PxC ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Loc:»hijnni PxV ; !^P^
 +Der1+Der/t+N+Pl+Com:»hijddi PxPlComV1 ; !^P^

LEXICON ACTORder !+SgNomCmp +SgGenCmp +PlGenCmp !Long compound-forms
 +N: GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N: EssV ;
 +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible

!LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTder !+SgNomCmp +SgGenCmp +PlGenCmp !Sometimes long compound-forms not in use now
! +N: GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
! +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
!! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
! +N: EssV ;
! +N: GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible


LEXICON ACTORTVder !+SgNomCmp +SgGenCmp +PlGenCmp +SgLeft +SgNomLeft +SgGenLeft +PlGenLeft
 +N+SgNomCmp: R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N: EssV ;
 +N:X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +N:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible

!LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTTVder not in use at the moment!+SgNomCmp +SgGenCmp +PlGenCmp +SgLeft +SgNomLeft +SgGenLeft +PlGenLeft
! +N+SgNomCmp: R ;
! +N+SgNomCmp:X7 R ;
! +N+SgCmp:W3 R ; !SUB
! +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
! +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7viđá K ;
!! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
! +N: EssV ;
! +N: GOAHTI-OBL ;
!! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
!! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
!! +N: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible


! Adjective derivation
! - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON LAS
 +Attr:%> ATTR ;  ! To capture the attributive forms before going to N lexica.
 VUOHTA ; !SUB
 MUSH ;

LEXICON LEXMUSH
 +N: MUSH ;
